Utah statutes.
41-6a-407.   Livestock on highway -- Restrictions -- Collision, action for damages.

(1) (a)  A person who owns or is in possession or control of any livestock may not willfully or negligently permit any of the livestock to stray or remain unaccompanied on a highway, if both sides of the highway are separated from adjoining property by a fence, wall, hedge, sidewalk, curb, lawn, or building. 

(b)  Subsection (1)(a) does not apply to range stock drifting onto any highway moving to or from their accustomed ranges.

(2) (a)  A person may not drive any livestock upon, over, or across any highway during the period from half an hour after sunset to half an hour before sunrise.

(b)  Subsection (2)(a) does not apply if the person has a sufficient number of herders with warning lights on continual duty to open the road to permit the passage of vehicles.

(3)  In any civil action brought for damages caused by collision with any domestic animal or livestock on a highway, there is no presumption that the collision was due to negligence on behalf of the owner or the person in possession of the domestic animal or livestock.

